cji.adv.morphology.lexd
PATTERNS
# without class prefix
AdvStem[no_pref] [<adv>:]

# with class prefix
(AdvClassPrefix AdvStem[-no_pref] [<adv>:])[^[a-pref,e-pref,i-pref]]


LEXICON AdvClassPrefix
<m.sg>:ва[a-pref]
<f.sg>:йа[a-pref]
<h.pl>:ба[a-pref]
<nonh1.sg>:ба[a-pref]
<nonh2.sg>:йа[a-pref]
<nonh3.sg>:йа[a-pref]
<nh.pl>:йа[a-pref]
<m.sg>:ве[e-pref]
<f.sg>:йе[e-pref]
<h.pl>:бе[e-pref]
<nonh1.sg>:бе[e-pref]
<nonh2.sg>:йе[e-pref]
<nonh3.sg>:йе[e-pref]
<nh.pl>:йе[e-pref]
<m.sg>:ви[i-pref]
<f.sg>:йи[i-pref]
<h.pl>:ба[i-pref]
<nonh1.sg>:би[i-pref]
<nonh2.sg>:йи[i-pref]
<nonh3.sg>:йи[i-pref]
<nh.pl>:йа[i-pref]
